North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 28. Uniform Costs and Fees in the Trial Divisions.
§ 7A-307.
Costs in administration of estates.

In the administration of the estates of decedents, minors, incompetents, of missing persons, in the administration of trusts under wills and under powers of attorney, in trust proceedings under

G.S. 36C-2-203

, in estate proceedings under

G.S. 28A-2-4

, in power of attorney proceedings under G.S. 32C-1-116(a), and in collections of personal property by affidavit, the following costs shall be assessed:

For the use of the courtroom and related judicial facilities, the sum of ten dollars ($10.00), to be remitted to the county. Funds derived from the facilities fees shall be used in the same manner, for the same purposes, and subject to the same restrictions, as facilities fees assessed in criminal actions.

(1a)

For the upgrade, maintenance, and operation of the judicial and county courthouse telecommunications and data connectivity, the sum of four dollars ($4.00), to be credited to the Court Information Technology Fund.

For support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of one hundred six dollars ($106.00), plus an additional forty cents (40¢) per one hundred dollars ($100.00), or major fraction thereof, of the gross estate, not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000). Gross estate shall include the fair market value of all personalty when received, and all proceeds from the sale of realty coming into the hands of the fiduciary, but shall not include the value of realty. In collections of personal property by affidavit, the fee based on the gross estate shall be computed from the information in the final affidavit of collection made pursuant to

G.S. 28A-25-3

and shall be paid when that affidavit is filed. In all other cases, this fee shall be computed from the information reported in the inventory. If additional gross estate, including income, comes into the hands of the fiduciary after the filing of the inventory, the fee for such additional value shall be computed from the information reported in the account or report disclosing such additional value. For each filing the minimum fee shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00). Sums collected under this subdivision shall be remitted to the State Treasurer.

(2a)

Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, the fee of forty cents (40¢) per one hundred dollars ($100.00), or major fraction, of the gross estate, not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000), shall not be assessed on personalty received by a trust under a will when the estate of the decedent was administered under Chapters 28 or 28A of the General Statutes. Instead, a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be assessed on the filing of each annual and final account. However, the fee shall be assessed only on newly contributed or acquired assets, all interest or other income that accrues or is earned on or with respect to any existing or newly contributed or acquired assets, and realized gains on the sale of any and all trust assets. Newly contributed or acquired assets do not include assets acquired by the sale, transfer, exchange, or otherwise of the amount of trust property on which fees were previously assessed.

(2b)

Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, the only cost assessed when the estate is administered or settled pursuant to

G.S. 28A-25-6

shall be a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) to be assessed upon filing of the application.

(2c)

Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, the fee of forty cents (40¢) per one hundred dollars ($100.00), or major fraction, of the gross estate shall not be assessed on the gross estate of a trust that is the subject of a proceeding under

G.S. 36C-2-203

if there is no requirement in the trust that accountings be filed with the clerk.

(2d)

Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, the only cost assessed in connection with the qualification of a limited personal representative under

G.S. 28A-29-1

shall be a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) to be assessed upon the filing of the petition.

For probate of a will without qualification of a personal representative, the clerk shall assess a facilities fee as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection and shall assess for support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of twenty dollars ($20.00).

For the support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall accompany any filing of a notice of hearing on a motion not listed in

G.S. 7A-308

that is filed with the clerk. No costs shall be assessed to a notice of hearing on a motion containing as a sole claim for relief the taxing of costs, including attorneys’ fees, or to a motion filed pursuant to

G.S. 1C-1602

or

G.S. 1C-1603

. No more than one fee shall be assessed for any motion for which a notice of hearing is filed, regardless of whether the hearing is continued, rescheduled, or otherwise delayed.

For the filing of a caveat to a will, the clerk shall assess for support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of two hundred dollars ($200.00).

Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, the only cost assessed in connection with the reopening of an estate administration under

G.S. 28A-23-5

shall be forty cents (40¢) per one hundred dollars ($100.00), or major fraction, of any additional gross estate, including income, coming into the hands of the fiduciary after the estate is reopened; provided that the total cost assessed when added to the total cost assessed in all prior administrations of the estate shall not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000).

For the filing of a petition for an elective share proceeding, the clerk shall assess for support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of two hundred dollars ($200.00).

In collections of personal property by affidavit, the facilities fee and thirty dollars ($30.00) of the General Court of Justice fee shall be paid at the time of filing the qualifying affidavit pursuant to

G.S. 28A-25-1

. If the sole asset of the estate is a cause of action, these fees shall be paid at the time of the qualification of the fiduciary.

(b1)

The clerk shall assess the following miscellaneous fees:

Filing and indexing a will with no probate first page $ 1.00 each additional page or fraction thereof .25 (2) Issuing letters to fiduciaries, per letter over five letters issued 1.00 (3) Inventory of safe deposits of a decedent, per box, per day 15.00 (4) Taking a deposition 10.00 (5) Docketing and indexing a will probated in another county in the State first page 6.00 each additional page or fraction thereof .25 (6) Hearing petition for year’s allowance to surviving spouse or child, in cases not assigned to a magistrate, and allotting the same 20.00

Click to view

The following additional expenses, when incurred, are also assessable or recoverable, as the case may be:

Witness fees, as provided by law.

Counsel fees, as provided by law.

Costs on appeal, of the original transcript of testimony, if any, insofar as essential to the appeal.

Fees for personal service of civil process, and other sheriff’s fees, as provided by law.

Fees of guardians ad litem, referees, receivers, commissioners, surveyors, arbitrators, appraisers, and other similar court appointees, as provided by law.

Costs assessed before the clerk shall be added to costs assessable on appeal to the judge or upon transfer to the civil issue docket.

Nothing in this section shall affect the liability of the respective parties for costs, as provided by law.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 31; 1969, c. 1190, s. 30; 1971, c. 1181, s. 1; 1973, c. 1335, s. 1; 1981, c. 691, s. 4; 1983, c. 713, ss. 10-17; 1985, c. 481, ss. 1-5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 855; 1987, c. 837; 1989, c. 719; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 811, ss. 4, 5; 1997-310, s. 4; 1998-212, s. 29A.12(d); 2000-109, s. 4(d); 2001-413, s. 1.2; 2001-424, s. 22.14(d); 2002-135, ss. 2, 3; 2005-276, s. 43.1(d); 2007-323, ss. 30.8(d), 30.10(b); 2008-107, s. 29.8(d); 2008-193, s. 2; 2009-444, s. 3; 2009-451, s. 15.20(h), (i); 2009-570, s. 29; 2011-145, s. 31.23(d); 2011-344, s. 2; 2011-391, s. 62; 2012-142, s. 16.5(e); 2013-225, s. 4(c); 2013-360, s. 18B.17(c); 2015-241, s. 18A.23(e); 2017-158, s. 13; 2017-197, s. 5.4A(c); 2018-40, s. 3; 2019-243, s. 11(a); 2020-60, s. 3.

§ 7A-308.
Miscellaneous fees and commissions.

The following miscellaneous fees and commissions shall be collected by the clerk of superior court and remitted to the State for the support of the General Court of Justice:

Foreclosure under power of sale in deed of trust or mortgage $300.00 If the property is sold under the power of sale, an additional amount will be charged, determined by the following formula: forty-five cents (.45) per one hundred dollars ($100.00), or major fraction thereof, of the final sale price. If the amount determined by the formula is less than ten dollars ($10.00), a minimum ten dollar ($10.00) fee will be collected. If the amount determined by the formula is more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), a maximum five hundred-dollar ($500.00) fee will be collected. (1a) In rem foreclosures conducted under , if the property is sold under execution

G.S. 105-375

$300.00 (2) Proceeding supplemental to execution. 30.00 (3) Confession of judgment. 25.00 (4) Taking a deposition 10.00 (5) Execution 25.00 (6) Notice of resumption of former name 10.00 (7) Taking an acknowledgment or administering an oath, or both, with or without seal, each certificate (except that oaths of office shall be administered to public officials without charge) 2.00 (8) Bond, taking justification or approving. 10.00 (9) Certificate, under seal 3.00 (10) Exemplification of records 10.00 (11) Recording or docketing (including indexing) any document first page 6.00 each additional page or fraction thereof .25 (12) Preparation of copies first page (of each document copied) 2.00 each additional page or fraction thereof .25 (13) Preparation and docketing of transcript of judgment 10.00 (14) Substitution of trustee in deed of trust 10.00 (15) Execution of passport application — the amount allowed by federal law (16) Repealed by Session Laws . 1989, c. 783, s. 2 (17) Criminal record search except if search is requested by an agency of the State or any of its political subdivisions or by an agency of the United States or by a petitioner in a proceeding under Article 2 of General Statutes Chapter 20 25.00 (18) Filing the affirmations, acknowledgments, agreements and resulting orders entered into under the provisions of and

G.S. 110-132

G.S. 110-133

6.00 (19) Repealed by Session Laws . 1989, c. 783, s. 3 (20) Filing a motion to assert a right of access under

G.S. 1-72.1

30.00 (21) In civil matters, except in actions commenced or prosecuted by a child support enforcement agency established pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, all alias and pluries summons issued and all endorsements issued on an original summons. 15.00.

Click to view

The fees and commissions set forth in this section are not chargeable when the service is performed as a part of the regular disposition of any action or special proceeding or the administration of an estate. When a transaction involves more than one of the services set forth in this section, only the greater service fee shall be charged. The Director of the Administrative Office of the courts shall issue guidelines pursuant to G.S. 7A-343(3) to be followed in administering this subsection.

(b1)

The fees set forth in subdivisions (9) and (12) of subsection (a) of this section are not chargeable when copies or certificates under seal are requested by an attorney who has been appointed or who is under contract with the Office of Indigent Defense Services to represent an indigent person at State expense, if the request is made in connection with the appointed case or the contract and during the duration of the appointment or the contract.

(b2)

The fees set forth in subdivision (11) of subsection (a) of this section are not chargeable when service is performed or documents are filed pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 14-112.3

or when an attorney is designating a period of secure leave pursuant to rules adopted by the Supreme Court of North Carolina.

A person who participates in a program for the collection of worthless checks under

G.S. 14-107.2

must pay a fee of sixty dollars ($60.00). The fee collected under this subsection must be remitted to the State by the clerk of the court in the county in which the program is established and credited to the Collection of Worthless Checks Fund. The Collection of Worthless Checks Fund is created as a special revenue fund. Revenue in the Fund does not revert at the end of the fiscal year, and interest and other investment income earned by the Fund accrues to the Fund. The money in the Fund is subject to appropriation by the General Assembly and may be used solely for the expenses of the programs established under

G.S. 14-107.2

for the collection of worthless checks, including personnel, equipment, and other costs of district attorneys’ offices that are attributable to the provision of these programs.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, ss. 32, 33; 1969, c. 1190, s. 31; 1971, c. 956, s. 2; 1973, c. 503, s. 16; c. 886; 1975, c. 829; 1981, c. 313, s. 1; 1983, c. 713, s. 18; 1985, c. 475, ss. 2, 3; c. 481, ss. 6-8; c. 511, s. 2; 1989, c. 783, ss. 2-4; c. 786, ss. 1, 3; 1997-114, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 18.22(a); 1998-23, s. 11; 1998-212, s. 16.3; 1999-237, s. 17.7; 2000-67, s. 15.3A(a); 2000-109, s. 4(e); 2001-516, s. 2; 2002-126, ss. 29A.7(a), 29A.13.1(a); 2002-135, s. 4; 2003-284, s. 36A.2; 2005-251, s. 1; 2007-323, ss. 30.8(e), (f), 30.10(c); 2008-193, s. 2; 2009-317, s. 1; 2009-451, s. 15.20(l); 2011-145, s. 31.23(e), (g); 2011-285, s. 1; 2011-391, s. 66.1; 2013-225, s. 4(d), (e); 2015-182, s. 3.5; 2019-177, s. 1; 2019-243, ss. 4, 12(a).

Cross References.

As to program for the collection of worthless check cases, see

G.S. 14-107.2

.

§ 7A-308.1.
Fees on deposits and investments.

On all funds received by the clerk by virtue or color of his office and deposited pursuant to

G.S. 7A-112.1

or invested pursuant to

G.S. 7A-112

, one or both of the fees provided for in this section shall be assessed and collected as follows:

On all funds deposited by the clerk in an interest bearing checking account pursuant to

G.S. 7A-112.1

, a fee of four percent (4%) of each principal amount so deposited shall be assessed and collected, subject to the following conditions:

The fee shall be collected from interest earnings only and shall not exceed the amount of the interest earnings on any principal amount so deposited, or seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), whichever is less;

All fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid to the county as court facilities fees and used as prescribed in G.S. 7A-304(a)(2);

All interest earnings in excess of the prescribed fee shall be remitted to the beneficial owner or owners of any principal amount when that amount is withdrawn and distributed by the clerk; and

If any principal amount is withdrawn from the checking account and invested pursuant to

G.S. 7A-112

, any interest in excess of the prescribed clerk’s fee which is invested with the principal amount shall be included in the fund upon which the fee provided for in subdivision (2) is computed.

On all funds to be invested by the clerk pursuant to

G.S. 7A-112

, a fee equal to five percent (5%) of each fund shall be assessed and collected, subject to the following conditions:

The fee shall be charged and deducted from each fund before the fund is invested, and only the balance shall be invested;

Over the life of an account, the fees charged on the initial funds and all funds subsequently placed with the clerk for that account shall not exceed the investment earnings on the account or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is less;

All fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for the support of the General Court of Justice; and

Any fees charged in excess of the cumulative investment earnings on an account shall be refunded and all investment earnings in excess of the prescribed fee shall be remitted to the beneficial owner or owners when all funds in that account are finally withdrawn and distributed by the clerk.

History.

1989, c. 783, s. 5.

§ 7A-309.
Magistrate’s special fees.

The following special fees shall be collected by the magistrate and remitted to the clerk of superior court for the use of the State in support of the General Court of Justice:

Performing marriage ceremony $50.00 (2) Hearing petition for year’s allowance to surviving spouse or child, issuing notices to commissioners, allotting the same, and making return 20.00 (3) Taking a deposition 10.00 (4) Proof of execution or acknowledgment of any instrument 2.00 (5) Performing any other statutory function not incident to a civil or criminal action $2.00.

Click to view

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1973, c. 503, s. 17; 1983, c. 713, s. 19; 2002-126, s. 29A.10(a); 2019-243, s. 11(b).

§ 7A-310.
Fees of commissioners and assessors appointed by magistrate.

Any person appointed by a magistrate as a commissioner or assessor, and who shall serve, shall be paid the sum of two dollars ($2.00), to be taxed as a part of the bill of costs of the proceeding.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1.

§ 7A-311.
Uniform civil process fees.

In a civil action or special proceeding, except for actions brought under Chapter 50B of the General Statutes, the following fees and commissions shall be assessed, collected, and remitted to the county:

For each item of civil process served, including summons, subpoenas, notices, motions, orders, writs and pleadings, the sum of thirty dollars ($30.00). When two or more items of civil process are served simultaneously on one party, only one thirty-dollar ($30.00) fee shall be charged.

When an item of civil process is served on two or more persons or organizations, a separate service charge shall be made for each person or organization. The process fee shall be remitted to the county. This subsection shall not apply to service of summons to jurors.

At least fifty percent (50%) of the fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be used by the county to ensure the timely service of process within the county, which may include the hiring of additional law enforcement personnel upon the recommendation of the sheriff.

For the seizure of personal property and its care after seizure, all necessary expenses, in addition to any fees for service of process.

For all sales by the sheriff of property, either real or personal, or for funds collected by the sheriff under any judgment, five percent (5%) on the first five hundred dollars ($500.00), and two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) on all sums over five hundred dollars ($500.00), plus necessary expenses of sale. Whenever an execution is issued to the sheriff, and subsequently while the execution is in force and outstanding, and after the sheriff has served or attempted to serve such execution, the judgment, or any part thereof, is paid directly or indirectly to the judgment creditor, the fee herein is payable to the sheriff on the amount so paid. The judgment creditor shall be responsible for collecting and paying all execution fees on amounts paid directly to the judgment creditor.

For execution of a judgment of ejectment, all necessary expenses, in addition to any fees for service of process.

For necessary transportation of individuals to or from State institutions or another state, the same mileage and subsistence allowances as are provided for State employees.

All fees that are required to be assessed, collected, and remitted under subsection (a) of this section shall be collected in advance (except in suits in forma pauperis) except those contingent on sales prices or statutory commissions. When the fee is not collected in advance or at the time of assessment, a lien shall exist in favor of the county on all property of the party owing the fee. If the fee remains unpaid it shall be entered as a judgment against the debtor and shall be docketed in the judgment docket in the office of the clerk of superior court.

The process fees and commissions set forth in this section are complete and exclusive and in lieu of any and all other process fees and commissions in civil actions and special proceedings.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 34; 1969, c. 1190, s. 31 1/2; 1973, c. 417, ss. 1, 2; c. 503, s. 18; c. 1139; 1979, c. 801, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1044, s. 2; 1998-212, s. 29A.12(e); 2002-126, ss. 29A.6(f), 29A.6(g); 2004-113, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 31.26(d); 2011-192, s. 7(n); 2015-55, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.26(d), effective August 1, 2011, in subdivision (a)(1)a., substituted “thirty dollars ($30.00)” for “fifteen dollars ($15.00)” and “thirty-dollar ($30.00) fee” for “fifteen-dollar ($15.00) fee.”

Session Laws 2015-55, s. 2, effective October 1, 2015, substituted “sales prices or statutory commissions” for “expenses or sales prices” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section requires civil process fees to be assessed, collected and remitted

when the law enforcement officer serves or attempts to serve civil process. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Larry J. McGlothlin, Cumberland County Sheriff’s Attorney, 49 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 47 (1979).

§ 7A-312.
Uniform fees for jurors; meals.

A juror in the General Court of Justice including a petit juror, or a coroner’s juror, but excluding a grand juror, shall receive twelve dollars ($12.00) for the first day of service and twenty dollars ($20.00) per day afterwards, except that if any person serves as a juror for more than five days in any 24-month period, the juror shall receive forty dollars ($40.00) per day for each day of service in excess of five days. A grand juror shall receive twenty dollars ($20.00) per day. A juror required to remain overnight at the site of the trial shall be furnished adequate accommodations and subsistence. If required by the presiding judge to remain in a body during the trial of a case, meals shall be furnished the jurors during the period of sequestration. Jurors from out of the county summoned to sit on a special venire shall receive mileage at the same rate as State employees. Persons summoned as jurors shall be exempt during their period of service from paying a ferry toll required under G.S. 136-82 to travel to and from their homes and the site of that service.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Administrative Office of the Courts may select a judicial district to operate a pilot program in which a juror may waive payment of the per diem fees provided for in that subsection. A juror waiving the fee may designate that the fee be used for any of the following services, if such services are provided in the district: (i) client treatment and service programs associated with a drug treatment or DWI treatment court program; (ii) courthouse self-help centers; (iii) courthouse child care centers; (iv) legal aid programs operated by a nonprofit corporation operating within the district; and (v) the Crime Victims Compensation Fund. If no such services are provided within the district, then waived fees are transferred to the Crime Victims Compensation Fund.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 1169; 1969, c. 1190, s. 32; 1971, c. 377, s. 26; 1973, c. 503, s. 19; 1979, c. 985; 1983, c. 881, ss. 2, 3; 1989, c. 646, s. 2; 1995, c. 324, ss. 21.1(a), (c); 2006-66, s. 14.17; 2006-187, s. 9; 2007-393, s. 16; 2012-180, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 14.17, as amended by Session Laws 2006-187, s. 9, effective July 1, 2006, and applicable to persons summoned to serve as jurors on or after August 27, 2006, in the first sentence, substituted “for the first day of service and twenty dollars ($20.00) per day afterwards” for “per day” and “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “thirty dollars ($30.00)”; and in the second sentence, substituted “twenty dollars ($20.00)” for “twelve dollars ($12.00).” For applicability provisions, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2007-393, s. 16, effective October 1, 2007, added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2012-180, s. 13, effective July 12, 2012, added the sixth sentence in subsection (a).

§ 7A-313.
Uniform jail fees. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Persons who are lawfully confined in jail awaiting trial shall be liable to the county or municipality maintaining the jail in the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) for each 24 hours’ confinement, or fraction thereof, except that a person so confined shall not be liable for this fee if the case or proceeding against him is dismissed, or if acquitted, or if judgment is arrested, or if probable cause is not found, or if the grand jury fails to return a true bill.

Persons who are ordered to pay jail fees pursuant to a probationary sentence shall be liable to the county or municipality maintaining the jail at the same per diem rate paid by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to local jails for maintaining a prisoner, as set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1969, c. 1190, s. 33; 1973, c. 503, s. 20; 1975, c. 444; 1989, c. 733, s. 1; 2000-109, s. 5; 2000-140, s. 104; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), 31.26(e); 2011-192, s. 7(n); 2017-186, s. 2(d).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in the last paragraph.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.26(e), effective August 1, 2011, substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)” in the first paragraph.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(d), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the second paragraph.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” wherever it appears. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 7A-313.
Uniform jail fees. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Persons who are lawfully confined in jail awaiting trial shall be liable to the county or municipality maintaining the jail in the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) for each 24 hours’ confinement, or fraction thereof, except that a person so confined shall not be liable for this fee if the case or proceeding against him is dismissed, or if acquitted, or if judgment is arrested, or if probable cause is not found, or if the grand jury fails to return a true bill.

Persons who are ordered to pay jail fees pursuant to a probationary sentence shall be liable to the county or municipality maintaining the jail at the same per diem rate paid by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction to local jails for maintaining a prisoner, as set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1969, c. 1190, s. 33; 1973, c. 503, s. 20; 1975, c. 444; 1989, c. 733, s. 1; 2000-109, s. 5; 2000-140, s. 104; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), 31.26(e); 2011-192, s. 7(n); 2017-186, s. 2(d); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

.The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in the last paragraph.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.26(e), effective August 1, 2011, substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)” in the first paragraph.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(d), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the second paragraph.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” wherever it appears. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 7A-313.1.
Fee for costs of electronic monitoring.

A county that provides the personnel, equipment, and other costs of providing electronic monitoring as a condition of an offender’s bond or pretrial release may collect a fee from the offender that is the lesser of the amount of the jail fee authorized in

G.S. 7A-313

or the actual cost of providing the electronic monitoring. A county may not collect a fee from an offender who is determined to be indigent and entitled to court-appointed counsel.

History.

2011-378, s. 1.

§ 7A-314.
Uniform fees for witnesses; experts; limit on number.

A witness under subpoena, bound over, or recognized, other than a salaried State, county, or municipal law-enforcement officer, or an out-of-state witness in a criminal case, whether to testify before the court, Judicial Standards Commission, jury of view, magistrate, clerk, referee, commissioner, appraiser, or arbitrator shall be entitled to receive five dollars ($5.00) per day, or fraction thereof, during his attendance, which, except as to witnesses before the Judicial Standards Commission, must be certified to the clerk of superior court. Compensation of witnesses acting on behalf of the court or prosecutorial offices shall be paid in accordance with the rules established by the Administrative Office of the Courts. Compensation of witnesses provided under

G.S. 7A-454

shall be in accordance with rules established by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

A witness entitled to the fee set forth in subsection (a) of this section, and a law-enforcement officer who qualifies as a witness, shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for travel expenses as follows:

A witness whose residence is outside the county of appearance but within 75 miles of the place of appearance shall be entitled to receive mileage reimbursement at the rate currently authorized for State employees, for each mile necessarily traveled from his place of resident to the place of appearance and return, each day. Reimbursements to witnesses acting on behalf of the court or prosecutorial offices shall be paid in accordance with the rules established by the Administrative Office of the Courts. Reimbursements to witnesses provided under

G.S. 7A-454

shall be in accordance with rules established by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

A witness whose residence is outside the county of appearance and more than 75 miles from the place of appearance shall be entitled to receive mileage reimbursement at the rate currently authorized State employees for one round-trip from his place of residence to the place of appearance. A witness required to appear more than one day shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for actual expenses incurred for lodging and meals not to exceed the maximum currently authorized for State employees, in lieu of daily mileage. Reimbursements to witnesses acting on behalf of the court or prosecutorial offices shall be paid in accordance with the rules established by the Administrative Office of the Courts. Reimbursements to witnesses provided under

G.S. 7A-454

shall be in accordance with rules established by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

A witness who resides in a state other than North Carolina and who appears for the purpose of testifying in a criminal action and proves his attendance may be compensated at the rate allowed to State officers and employees by subdivisions (1) and (2) of

G.S. 138-6(a)

for one round-trip from his place of residence to the place of appearance, and five dollars ($5.00) for each day that he is required to travel and attend as a witness, upon order of the court based upon a finding that the person was a necessary witness. If such a witness is required to appear more than one day, he is also entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses incurred for lodging and meals, not to exceed the maximum currently authorized for State employees. Reimbursements to witnesses acting on behalf of the court or prosecutorial offices shall be paid in accordance with the rules established by the Administrative Office of the Courts. Reimbursements to witnesses provided under

G.S. 7A-454

shall be in accordance with rules established by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

Subject to the specific limitations set forth in G.S. 7A-305(d)(11), an expert witness, other than a salaried State, county, or municipal law-enforcement officer, shall receive such compensation and allowances as the court, or the Judicial Standards Commission, in its discretion, may authorize. A law-enforcement officer who appears as an expert witness shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses only, as provided in subsection (b) of this section. Compensation of experts acting on behalf of the court or prosecutorial offices shall be paid in accordance with the rules established by the Administrative Office of the Courts. Compensation of experts provided under

G.S. 7A-454

shall be in accordance with rules established by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

If more than two witnesses are subpoenaed, bound over, or recognized, to prove a single material fact, the expense of the additional witnesses shall be borne by the party issuing or requesting the subpoena.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 16.3(a), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1969, c. 1190, s. 34; 1971, c. 377, s. 27; 1973, c. 503, ss. 21, 22; 1983, c. 713, s. 20; 1998-212, s. 16.25(a); 2000-144, s. 3; 2006-187, s. 5(a); 2007-323, s. 14.23; 2010-31, s. 15.7; 2011-391, s. 64; 2012-142, s. 16.3(a); 2015-153, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to items allowed as costs generally, see

G.S. 6-1

.

As to proof of attendance by witness, see

G.S. 6-53

.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-187, s. 5(a), effective August 3, 2006, rewrote subsection (f).

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 14.23, effective July 1, 2007, added the second sentence of subsection (f).

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 15.7, effective July 1, 2010, added the third sentence in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.23C(a), as added by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 64, effective July 1, 2011, added the last two sentences in subsections (a) and (c); an added the last two sentences in subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2).

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 16.3(a), effective July 1, 2012, deleted subsection (f) which read: “In any case in which the Judicial Department is bearing the costs of representation for a party and that party or a witness for that party does not speak or understand the English language, and the court appoints a foreign language interpreter to assist that party or witness, the reasonable fee for the interpreter’s services is payable from funds appropriated to the Administrative Office of the Courts. In order to facilitate the disposition of criminal or Chapter 50B cases, the court may authorize the use of a court interpreter, paid from funds appropriated to the Administrative Office of the Courts, in cases in which an interpreter is necessary to assist the court in the efficient transaction of business. The appointment and payment shall be made in accordance with G.S. 7A-343(9c).”

Session Laws 2015-153, s. 2, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to motions or applications for costs filed on or after that date, inserted “Subject to the specific limitations set forth in G.S. 7A-305(d)(11)” in subsection (d).

§ 7A-314.1.
Family court fees.

The Administrative Office of the Courts may charge a uniform fee of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per hour to persons receiving the services of a supervised visitation and exchange center through a family court program. The fees collected under this section may be used by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts to support the continued operation of supervised visitation and exchange centers which provide services to family court clients regarding domestic violence, substance abuse, mental illness, parental alienation, and other issues.

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may establish a procedure for persons to apply for a reduction in the fee, based upon the person’s ability to pay as a result of indigence, status as a victim of domestic violence, or other circumstances.

History.

2004-110, s. 7.1; 2013-304, s. 1.

§ 7A-315.
Liability of State for witness fees in criminal cases when defendant not liable.

In a criminal action, if no prosecuting witness is designated by the court as liable for the costs, and the defendant is acquitted, or convicted and unable to pay, or a nolle prosequi is entered, or judgment is arrested, or probable cause is not found, or the grand jury fails to return a true bill, the State shall be liable for the witness fees allowed per

G.S. 7A-314

and any expenses for blood tests and comparisons incurred per

G.S. 8-50.1(a)

.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1979, c. 576, s. 4.